Nebraska, session 109, LB1217.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1217 LB1217
2026 2026
1 Section 1. The State Department of Education may authorize any
2 accredited or approved public, private, denominational, or parochial
3 school to maintain epinephrine in any form approved by the federal Food
4 and Drug Administration for the purpose of emergency first aid to
5 students who experience allergic reactions.
-2-